Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 62.1-44.2.
Short title; purpose.

The short title of this chapter is the State Water Control Law. It is the policy of the Commonwealth of Virginia and the purpose of this law to: (1) protect existing high quality state waters and restore all other state waters to such condition of quality that any such waters will permit all reasonable public uses and will support the propagation and growth of all aquatic life, including game fish, which might reasonably be expected to inhabit them; (2) safeguard the clean waters of the Commonwealth from pollution; (3) prevent any increase in pollution; (4) reduce existing pollution; (5) promote and encourage the reclamation and reuse of wastewater in a manner protective of the environment and public health; and (6) promote water resource conservation, management and distribution, and encourage water consumption reduction in order to provide for the health, safety, and welfare of the present and future citizens of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §

62.1-14

; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1978, c. 827; 2000, c. 972.

Cross references.

As to the Attorney General’s limited authority to institute and conduct criminal prosecutions in the circuit courts of the Commonwealth, see §

2.2-511

.

As to the environmental laboratory certification program of the Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services, see §

2.2-1105

.

As to exemption of general permits issued pursuant to the State Water Control Law from Article 2 of the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4006

.

As to regulation of car-washing fundraisers by localities, see §

15.2-2114.1

.

As to authority of localities to establish and enforce standards for use and services of sanitary, combined and stormwater sewer systems, treatment works and appurtenances, including implementation of pretreatment requirements pursuant to the State Water Control Act, see subdivision 10 of §

15.2-2122

.

Editor’s note.

This chapter, with the exception of
§§

62.1-44.34:1

and
62.1-44.34:2, was repealed by Acts 1973, c. 471. The 1973 act, which was effective July 1, 1974, and provided that it should expire at midnight on that date unless earlier reenacted, was itself repealed by Acts 1974, c. 96, effective March 22, 1974, and therefore never went into effect.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 972 added clause (5) and redesignated former clause (5) as present clause (6).

Law Review.

For article on problems of water resource management in Virginia, see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 388 (1971).

For note, “Public Regulation of Water Quality in Virginia,” see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 424 (1971).

For note on private remedies to abate water pollution, see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 477 (1971).

For article on state constitutions and the environment, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 193 (1972).

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972).

For article assessing the adequacy of Virginia’s water policy, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 312 (1972).

For article, “Virginia Natural Resources Law and the New Virginia Wetlands Act,” see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 19 (1973).

For article discussing issues relating to toxic substances litigation, focusing on the Fourth Circuit, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 247 (1982).

For article discussing common-law principles underlying public interests in tidal water resources, see 23 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 835 (1982).

For article, “Water Rights Legislation in the East; A Program for Reform,” see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 547 (1983).

For article, “Public Access to Virginia’s Tidelands: A Framework for Analysis of Implied Dedications and Public Prescriptive Rights,” see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 669 (1983).

For article on stream flow maintenance in Virginia, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June, 1996, to June, 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-711.1 Commercial Credit Line Deed of Trust, Assignment of Leases and Security Agreement.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 20; 20 M.J. Waters and Watercourses, §§ 3, 19.14B M.J. Process, § 16.

§ 62.1-44.3.
(For expiration date, see Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345) Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following terms as used in this chapter shall have the meanings hereinafter respectively ascribed to them:

“Beneficial use”
means both instream and offstream uses. Instream beneficial uses include, but are not limited to, the protection of fish and wildlife resources and habitat, maintenance of waste assimilation, recreation, navigation, and cultural and aesthetic values. The preservation of instream flows for purposes of the protection of navigation, maintenance of waste assimilation capacity, the protection of fish and wildlife resources and habitat, recreation, cultural and aesthetic values is an instream beneficial use of Virginia’s waters. Offstream beneficial uses include, but are not limited to, domestic (including public water supply), agricultural uses, electric power generation, commercial, and industrial uses.

“Board” means the State Water Control Board. However, when used outside the context of the promulgation of regulations, including regulations to establish general permits, pursuant to this chapter, “Board” means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Certificate”
means any certificate issued by the Department.

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Establishment”
means any industrial establishment, mill, factory, tannery, paper or pulp mill, mine, coal mine, colliery, breaker or coal-processing operations, quarry, oil refinery, boat, vessel, and every other industry or plant or works the operation of which produces industrial wastes or other wastes or which may otherwise alter the physical, chemical or biological properties of any state waters.

“Excavate” or “excavation” means ditching, dredging, or mechanized removal of earth, soil or rock.

“Industrial wastes” means liquid or other wastes resulting from any process of industry, manufacture, trade, or business or from the development of any natural resources.

“The law” or “this law” means the law contained in this chapter as now existing or hereafter amended.

“Member” means a member of the Board.

“Normal agricultural activities”
means those activities defined as an agricultural operation in § 3.2-300 and any activity that is conducted as part of or in furtherance of such agricultural operation but shall not include any activity for which a permit would have been required as of January 1, 1997, under 33 U.S.C. § 1344 or any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

“Normal silvicultural activities” means any silvicultural activity as defined in § 10.1-1181.1 and any activity that is conducted as part of or in furtherance of such silvicultural activity but shall not include any activity for which a permit would have been required as of January 1, 1997, under 33 U.S.C. § 1344 or any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

“Other wastes”
means decayed wood, sawdust, shavings, bark, lime, garbage, refuse, ashes, offal, tar, oil, chemicals, and all other substances except industrial wastes and sewage which may cause pollution in any state waters.

“Owner”
means the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions, including but not limited to sanitation district commissions and authorities and any public or private institution, corporation, association, firm, or company organized or existing under the laws of this or any other state or country, or any officer or agency of the United States, or any person or group of persons acting individually or as a group that owns, operates, charters, rents, or otherwise exercises control over or is responsible for any actual or potential discharge of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes to state waters, or any facility or operation that has the capability to alter the physical, chemical, or biological properties of state waters in contravention of §

62.1-44.5

.

“Person”
means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, governmental body, municipal corporation, or any other legal entity.

“Policies”
means policies established under subdivisions (3a) and (3b) of §

62.1-44.15

.

“Pollution”
means such alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any state waters as will or is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters (a) harmful or detrimental or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare or to the health of animals, fish, or aquatic life; (b) unsuitable with reasonable treatment for use as present or possible future sources of public water supply; or (c) unsuitable for recreational, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other reasonable uses, provided that (i) an alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological property of state waters or a discharge or deposit of sewage, industrial wastes or other wastes to state waters by any owner which by itself is not sufficient to cause pollution but which, in combination with such alteration of or discharge or deposit to state waters by other owners, is sufficient to cause pollution; (ii) the discharge of untreated sewage by any owner into state waters; and (iii) contributing to the contravention of standards of water quality duly established by the Board, are “pollution” for the terms and purposes of this chapter.

“Pretreatment requirements”
means any requirements arising under the Board’s pretreatment regulations including the duty to allow or carry out inspections, entry, or monitoring activities; any rules, regulations, or orders issued by the owner of a publicly owned treatment works; or any reporting requirements imposed by the owner of a publicly owned treatment works or by the regulations of the Board.

“Pretreatment standards”
means any standards of performance or other requirements imposed by regulation of the Board upon an industrial user of a publicly owned treatment works.

“Reclaimed water”
means water resulting from the treatment of domestic, municipal, or industrial wastewater that is suitable for a direct beneficial or controlled use that would not otherwise occur. Specifically excluded from this definition is “gray water.”

“Reclamation”
means the treatment of domestic, municipal, or industrial wastewater or sewage to produce reclaimed water for a direct beneficial or controlled use that would not otherwise occur.

“Regulation”
means a regulation issued under §

62.1-44.15

(10).

“Reuse”
means the use of reclaimed water for a direct beneficial use or a controlled use that is in accordance with the requirements of the Board.

“Rule”
means a rule adopted by the Board to regulate the procedure of the Board pursuant to § 62.1-44.15 (7).

“Ruling”
means a ruling issued under § 62.1-44.15 (9).

“Sewage”
means the water-carried human wastes from residences, buildings, industrial establishments or other places together with such industrial wastes and underground, surface, storm, or other water as may be present.

“Sewage treatment works”
or “treatment works” means any device or system used in the storage, treatment, disposal, or reclamation of sewage or combinations of sewage and industrial wastes, including but not limited to pumping, power, and other equipment, and appurtenances, and any works, including land, that are or will be (i) an integral part of the treatment process or (ii) used for the ultimate disposal of residues or effluent resulting from such treatment. These terms shall not include onsite sewage systems or alternative discharging sewage systems.

“Sewerage system”
means pipelines or conduits, pumping stations, and force mains, and all other construction, devices, and appliances appurtenant thereto, used for conducting sewage or industrial wastes or other wastes to a point of ultimate disposal.

“Special order”
means a special order issued under subdivisions (8a), (8b), and (8c) of §

62.1-44.15

.

“Standards”
means standards established under subdivisions (3a) and (3b) of §

62.1-44.15

.

“State waters”
means all water, on the surface and under the ground, wholly or partially within or bordering the Commonwealth or within its jurisdiction, including wetlands.

“Wetlands”
means those areas that are inundated or saturated by surface or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs and similar areas.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-15; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1988, c. 167; 1990, c. 717; 1991, c. 702; 2000, cc. 972, 1032, 1054; 2003, c. 614; 2007, c. 659; 2015, cc. 104, 677; 2016, cc. 68, 758; 2022, c. 356.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.3

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2000, cc. 1032 and
1054, cl. 2, as amended by Acts
2001, cc. 435 and
464, cls. 1 and 2, provide: “That the State Water Control Board shall promulgate regulations governing excavation activities in wetlands to be effective within 280 days of enactment of this act and shall adopt proposed regulations to implement all other provisions of this act by January 1, 2001, to become effective on October 1, 2001; provided however, and notwithstanding any other provision(s) of law to the contrary, including
§§

62.1-44.5

,

62.1-44.15

, and

62.1-44.15:5

, that the proposed amendment to the State Water Control Board’s regulations 9 VAC 25-210 et seq. and 9 VAC 25-680 et seq., acted upon by the Board on December 13, 2000, shall, when promulgated as final regulations upon completion of the regulatory process established by the Administrative Process Act ( § 9-6.14:1 et seq. [now
§

2.2-4000

et seq.]) become effective on August 1, 2001, with respect to linear transportation projects of the Virginia Department of Transportation.”

Acts
2000, cc. 1032 and
1054, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Water Control Board shall promptly, but no later than July 1, 2002, seek from the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers the issuance to Virginia of a § 404 Clean Water Act State Programmatic General Permit. The Board shall report to the House Committee on Chesapeake and Its Tributaries and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources at least every six months on its progress in obtaining the State Programmatic General Permit.”

Acts
2000, cc. 1032 and
1054, cl. 4 provides: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to restrict the State Water Control Board’s authority to issue Virginia Water Protection Permits for activities requiring certification under § 401 of the Clean Water Act.”

Acts
2003, c. 614, cl. 2, provides: “That the Sewage Collection and Treatment regulations promulgated by the Virginia Board of Health that are in effect as of the effective date of this act shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended or rescinded by the State Water Control Board pursuant to its authority under subsection D of
§

62.1-44.18

of this act.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, Title 3.2 references were substituted for Title 3.1 references to conform to Acts
2008, c. 860.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 972 substituted a period for a semicolon at the end of the paragraphs throughout the section; added the paragraphs defining “Reuse,” “Reclaimed water,” and “Reclamation,” and deleted “and” at the end of the paragraph defining “Pretreatment requirements.”

The 2000 amendments by cc. 1032 and 1054 are identical, and added “including wetlands” at the end of the paragraph defining “State waters”; deleted “and” at the end of the paragraph defining “Pretreatment requirements”; and added the paragraphs defining, “Excavate” or “excavation,” “Normal agricultural activities,” “Normal silvicultural activities,” and “Wetlands.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 614 inserted the definition of “Sewage treatment works.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 659 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 104 and 677 are identical, and added the definitions for “Department” and “Director.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 added the second sentence in the definition of “Board”; and substituted “Department” for “Board” in the definition of “Certificate.”

Law Review.

For article on stream flow maintenance in Virginia, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 485 (1984).

For survey of administrative procedure in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 431 (1989).

For 2000 survey of Virginia environmental law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 799 (2000).

For 2003/2004 survey of real estate and land use law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 357 (2004).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

For article, “Construction Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 227 (2010).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Administrative Law, § 16.

§ 62.1-44.3.
(For effective date, see Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345) Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following terms as used in this chapter shall have the meanings hereinafter respectively ascribed to them:

“Beneficial use”
means both instream and offstream uses. Instream beneficial uses include, but are not limited to, the protection of fish and wildlife resources and habitat, maintenance of waste assimilation, recreation, navigation, and cultural and aesthetic values. The preservation of instream flows for purposes of the protection of navigation, maintenance of waste assimilation capacity, the protection of fish and wildlife resources and habitat, recreation, cultural and aesthetic values is an instream beneficial use of Virginia’s waters. Offstream beneficial uses include, but are not limited to, domestic (including public water supply), agricultural uses, electric power generation, commercial, and industrial uses.

“Board”
means the State Water Control Board. However, when used outside the context of the promulgation of regulations, including regulations to establish general permits, pursuant to this chapter,

“Board”

means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Certificate”
means any certificate or permit issued by the Department.

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Establishment”
means any industrial establishment, mill, factory, tannery, paper or pulp mill, mine, coal mine, colliery, breaker or coal-processing operations, quarry, oil refinery, boat, vessel, and every other industry or plant or works the operation of which produces industrial wastes or other wastes or which may otherwise alter the physical, chemical or biological properties of any state waters.

“Excavate”
or “excavation” means ditching, dredging, or mechanized removal of earth, soil or rock.

“Industrial wastes”
means liquid or other wastes resulting from any process of industry, manufacture, trade, or business or from the development of any natural resources.

“Land-disturbance approval”
means an approval allowing a land-disturbing activity to commence issued by (i) a Virginia Erosion and Stormwater Management Program authority after the requirements of §

62.1-44.15:34

have been met or (ii) a Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program authority after the requirements of §

62.1-44.15:55

have been met.

“The law”
or

“this law”

means the law contained in this chapter as now existing or hereafter amended.

“Member”
means a member of the Board.

“Municipal separate storm sewer”
means a conveyance or system of conveyances otherwise known as a municipal separate storm sewer system or “MS4,” including roads with drainage systems, municipal streets, catch basins, curbs, gutters, ditches, man-made channels, or storm drains, that is:

Owned or operated by a federal entity, state, city, town, county, district, association, or other public body, created by or pursuant to state law, having jurisdiction over disposal of sewage, industrial wastes, stormwater, or other wastes, including a special district under state law such as a sewer district, flood control district, drainage district or similar entity, or a designated and approved management agency under § 208 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.) that discharges to surface waters;

Designed or used for collecting or conveying stormwater;

Not a combined sewer; and

Not part of a publicly owned treatment works.

“Normal agricultural activities” means those activities defined as an agricultural operation in § 3.2-300 and any activity that is conducted as part of or in furtherance of such agricultural operation but shall not include any activity for which a permit would have been required as of January 1, 1997, under 33 U.S.C. § 1344 or any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

“Normal silvicultural activities” means any silvicultural activity as defined in § 10.1-1181.1 and any activity that is conducted as part of or in furtherance of such silvicultural activity but shall not include any activity for which a permit would have been required as of January 1, 1997, under 33 U.S.C. § 1344 or any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

“Other wastes”
means decayed wood, sawdust, shavings, bark, lime, garbage, refuse, ashes, offal, tar, oil, chemicals, and all other substances except industrial wastes and sewage which may cause pollution in any state waters.

“Owner”
means the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions, including but not limited to sanitation district commissions and authorities and any public or private institution, corporation, association, firm, or company organized or existing under the laws of this or any other state or country, or any officer or agency of the United States, or any person or group of persons acting individually or as a group that owns, operates, charters, rents, or otherwise exercises control over or is responsible for any actual or potential discharge of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes to state waters, or any facility or operation that has the capability to alter the physical, chemical, or biological properties of state waters in contravention of §

62.1-44.5

.

“Person”
means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, governmental body, municipal corporation, or any other legal entity.

“Policies”
means policies established under subdivisions (3a) and (3b) of §

62.1-44.15

.

“Pollution”
means such alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any state waters as will or is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters (a) harmful or detrimental or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare or to the health of animals, fish, or aquatic life; (b) unsuitable with reasonable treatment for use as present or possible future sources of public water supply; or (c) unsuitable for recreational, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other reasonable uses, provided that (i) an alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological property of state waters or a discharge or deposit of sewage, industrial wastes or other wastes to state waters by any owner which by itself is not sufficient to cause pollution but which, in combination with such alteration of or discharge or deposit to state waters by other owners, is sufficient to cause pollution; (ii) the discharge of untreated sewage by any owner into state waters; and (iii) contributing to the contravention of standards of water quality duly established by the Board, are “pollution” for the terms and purposes of this chapter.

“Pretreatment requirements”
means any requirements arising under the Board’s pretreatment regulations including the duty to allow or carry out inspections, entry, or monitoring activities; any rules, regulations, or orders issued by the owner of a publicly owned treatment works; or any reporting requirements imposed by the owner of a publicly owned treatment works or by the regulations of the Board.

“Pretreatment standards” means any standards of performance or other requirements imposed by regulation of the Board upon an industrial user of a publicly owned treatment works.

“Reclaimed water”
means water resulting from the treatment of domestic, municipal, or industrial wastewater that is suitable for a direct beneficial or controlled use that would not otherwise occur. Specifically excluded from this definition is “gray water.”

“Reclamation”
means the treatment of domestic, municipal, or industrial wastewater or sewage to produce reclaimed water for a direct beneficial or controlled use that would not otherwise occur.

“Regulation”
means a regulation issued under subdivision (10) of §

62.1-44.15

.

“Reuse”
means the use of reclaimed water for a direct beneficial use or a controlled use that is in accordance with the requirements of the Board.

“Rule”
means a rule adopted by the Board to regulate the procedure of the Board pursuant to subdivision (7) of § 62.1-44.15.

“Ruling”
means a ruling issued under subdivision (9) of § 62.1-44.15.

“Sewage”
means the water-carried human wastes from residences, buildings, industrial establishments or other places together with such industrial wastes and underground, surface, storm, or other water as may be present.

“Sewage treatment works”
or “treatment works” means any device or system used in the storage, treatment, disposal, or reclamation of sewage or combinations of sewage and industrial wastes, including but not limited to pumping, power, and other equipment, and appurtenances, and any works, including land, that are or will be (i) an integral part of the treatment process or (ii) used for the ultimate disposal of residues or effluent resulting from such treatment. These terms shall not include onsite sewage systems or alternative discharging sewage systems.

“Sewerage system”
means pipelines or conduits, pumping stations, and force mains, and all other construction, devices, and appliances appurtenant thereto, used for conducting sewage or industrial wastes or other wastes to a point of ultimate disposal.

“Special order” means a special order issued under subdivisions (8a), (8b), and (8c) of § 62.1-44.15.

“Standards”
means standards established under subdivisions (3a) and (3b) of § 62.1-44.15.

“State waters”
means all water, on the surface and under the ground, wholly or partially within or bordering the Commonwealth or within its jurisdiction, including wetlands.

“Wetlands”
means those areas that are inundated or saturated by surface or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs and similar areas.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-15; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1988, c. 167; 1990, c. 717; 1991, c. 702; 2000, cc. 972, 1032, 1054; 2003, c. 614; 2007, c. 659; 2015, cc. 104, 677; 2016, cc. 68, 758; contingently amended by 2022, c. 356.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.3

.

§ 62.1-44.3:1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this chapter the Board or the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board or the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 62.1-44.4.
Control by Commonwealth as to water quality.

No right to continue existing quality degradation in any state water shall exist nor shall such right be or be deemed to have been acquired by virtue of past or future discharge of sewage, industrial wastes or other wastes or other action by any owner. The right and control of the Commonwealth in and over all state waters is hereby expressly reserved and reaffirmed.

Waters whose existing quality is better than the established standards as of the date on which such standards become effective will be maintained at high quality; provided that the Board has the power to authorize any project or development, which would constitute a new or an increased discharge of effluent to high quality water, when it has been affirmatively demonstrated that a change is justifiable to provide necessary economic or social development; and provided, further, that the necessary degree of waste treatment to maintain high water quality will be required where physically and economically feasible. Present and anticipated use of such waters will be preserved and protected.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-16; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1603 (1970).

For article on stream flow maintenance in Virginia, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 485 (1984).